Utah statutes.
17B-2a-817.   Voter approval required for property tax levy.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17B-1-1001 and in addition to a property tax under Section 17B-1-1103 to pay general obligation bonds of the district, a public transit district may levy a property tax, as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 10, Local District Property Tax Levy, if:

(1)  the district first submits the proposal to levy the property tax to voters within the district; and

(2)  a majority of voters within the district voting on the proposal vote in favor of the tax at an election held for that purpose.



Amended by Chapter 159, 2010 General Session

